Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.550

Authority to solicit gifts, grants, and support.

The department may solicit gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests and devises for the use or benefit of the early childhood state education and assistance program established by RCW 43.216.500 through 43.216.550 and 43.216.900 and 43.216.901. The department shall actively solicit support from business and industry and from the federal government for the state early childhood education and assistance program and shall assist local programs in developing partnerships with the community for eligible children.

[ 2019 c 408 s 12; 1994 c 166 s 11; 1990 c 33 s 215; 1988 c 174 s 9; 1985 c 418 s 11. Formerly RCW 43.215.450, 28A.215.200, 28A.34A.110.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 408: See note following RCW 43.216.512.

Effective date—1994 c 166: See note following RCW 43.216.500.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.